Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-792
Election results; effect; vacancy; special election.

(1) If a majority of the votes cast at a recall election are against the removal of the trustee named on the ballot or the election results in a tie, the trustee shall continue in office for the remainder of his or her term.

(2) If a majority of the votes cast at a recall election are for the removal of the trustee named on the ballot, he or she shall, regardless of any technical defects in the recall petition, be deemed removed from office unless a recount is ordered. If the trustee is deemed removed, the removal shall result in an immediate vacancy in the office from the date of the election. The vacancy shall be filled as provided in subsection (2) of section 31-735.

(3) If there are vacancies in the offices of a majority or more of the members of the board of trustees at one time due to the recall of such members, a special election to fill such vacancies shall be conducted as expeditiously as possible by the filing clerk in the manner specified in section 31-735.

(4) No trustee who is removed at a recall election or who resigns after the initiation of the recall process shall be appointed to fill the vacancy resulting from his or her removal or the removal of any other member of the same board of trustees during the remainder of his or her term of office.

Laws 1997, LB 874, § 7.